Illinois, session 104th, SB2966.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 527-23.19 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/27-23.19 new)7    Sec. 27-23.19. Active-transportation safety training. 8    (a) As used in this Section, "active transportation" means 9bicycling, pedestrian activities, and other forms of 10nonmotorized transportation.11    (b) Each school district maintaining any elementary grades 12must provide its public school pupils enrolled in kindergarten 13through grade 3 with age-appropriate, active-transportation 14safety training. At a minimum, the active-transportation 15safety training must include pedestrian safety, including 16crossing roads.17    (c) Each school district maintaining any elementary grades 18must provide its public school pupils enrolled in grades 4 19through 8 with age-appropriate, active-transportation safety 20training. At a minimum, the active-transportation safety 21training must include:22        (1) pedestrian safety, including crossing roads safely 23    using the technique of searching left, right, and left for   SB2966- 2 -LRB104 19375 LNS 32823 b1    vehicles in traffic;2        (2) bicycle safety, including relevant traffic laws, 3    the use and proper fit of protective headgear, bicycle 4    parts and safety features, and safe biking techniques; and5        (3) electric-assisted bicycle safety, including that a 6    person under the age of 16 is not allowed to operate an 7    electric-assisted bicycle.8    (d) A nonpublic school maintaining any elementary grades 9may provide its nonpublic school pupils enrolled in 10kindergarten through grade 8 with active-transportation safety 11training as specified in subsections (b) and (c).12    (e) A school district and a nonpublic school may provide 13kindergarten pupils with active-transportation safety training 14under this Section before the first day of school.15    (f) A school district may provide active-transportation 16safety training under this Section through an online program 17or course.18    (g) A school district and a nonpublic school must make 19reasonable accommodations under this Section for the 20active-transportation safety training of pupils known to speak 21English as a second language and pupils with disabilities.22    (h) The Secretary of Transportation must maintain a 23comprehensive collection of active-transportation safety 24training materials that meets the requirements of this 25Section. 26    (i) This Section is in addition to any other   SB2966- 3 -LRB104 19375 LNS 32823 b1transportation-safety training laws.